Florida, session 2026, SB1228.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 31 32 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âSurvivor Safety 33 Act.â 34 Section 2.âSection 776.012, Florida Statutes, is amended to 35 read: 36 776.012âUse or threatened use of force in defense of 37 person.â 38 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 39 (a)ââChildâ has the same meaning as in s. 39.01. 40 (b)ââDocumented historyâ means the existence of one or more 41 of any of the following records regarding a person and a known 42 abuser: 43 1.âA valid and unexpired injunction issued for protection 44 against domestic violence under s. 741.30 or repeat violence, 45 sexual violence, or dating violence under s. 784.046. 46 2.âA prior sworn criminal complaint, police report, arrest 47 affidavit, or conviction record evidencing an act of domestic 48 violence as defined in s. 741.28 or dating violence as defined 49 in s. 784.046. 50 3.âMedical records or forensic examination reports 51 documenting injuries consistent with domestic violence, repeat 52 violence, sexual violence, or dating violence attributed to the 53 known abuser. 54 4.âCertified records from a domestic violence center or 55 similar agency documenting the personâs status as a victim of 56 abuse by the known abuser. 57 (c)ââKnown abuserâ means the recorded perpetrator of 58 domestic violence, repeat violence, sexual violence, or dating 59 violence against the person or the personâs child, provided that 60 this same individual is the person against whom force was used 61 in the incident giving rise to the claim of self-defense. 62 (2)âA person is justified in using or threatening to use 63 force, except deadly force, against another when and to the 64 extent that the person reasonably believes that such conduct is 65 necessary to defend himself or herself or another against the 66 otherâs imminent use of unlawful force. A person who uses or 67 threatens to use force in accordance with this subsection does 68 not have a duty to retreat before using or threatening to use 69 such force. 70 (3)(2)âA person is justified in using or threatening to use 71 deadly force if he or she reasonably believes that using or 72 threatening to use such force is necessary to prevent imminent 73 death or great bodily harm to himself or herself or another or 74 to prevent the imminent commission of a forcible felony. A 75 person who uses or threatens to use deadly force in accordance 76 with this subsection does not have a duty to retreat and has the 77 right to stand his or her ground if the person using or 78 threatening to use the deadly force is not engaged in a criminal 79 activity and is in a place where he or she has a right to be. 80 (4)âThere is a rebuttable presumption that a person who 81 uses force in accordance with subsection (2) or subsection (3) 82 against a known abuser acts with a reasonable fear of imminent 83 peril of death or great bodily harm if the person establishes by 84 a preponderance of the evidence that he or she has a documented 85 history of domestic violence, repeat violence, sexual violence, 86 or dating violence perpetrated by the known abuser against 87 himself or herself or his or her child. 88 (a)âThe rebuttable presumption applies if: 89 1.âA person presents credible evidence of a documented 90 history; 91 2.âThe person used force in response to an objectively 92 reasonable apprehension of imminent peril of death or great 93 bodily harm, sexual assault, or kidnapping based on the totality 94 of the circumstances, taking into account the history of 95 violence. The presumption acknowledges that prior violence 96 informs the reasonableness of the personâs perception of 97 imminent harm; 98 3.âThe person did not provoke or initiate the confrontation 99 that led to the use of force, and was not engaged in any 100 unlawful activity at the time; and 101 4.âThe use of force occurred in a place where the person 102 had a legal right to be. 103 (b)âIf the rebuttable presumption applies, the court shall 104 instruct the jury regarding the existence of this presumption 105 and the shift in the burden of proof, and the prosecution bears 106 the burden of rebutting the presumption beyond a reasonable 107 doubt that a defendant acted with a reasonable fear of imminent 108 peril of death or great bodily harm. 109 (c)âThe court may determine in a pretrial evidentiary 110 hearing whether the defendant has met the threshold showing of a 111 documented history sufficient to meet the presumption for trial 112 purposes. 113 (d)âEvidence of the documented history of domestic 114 violence, repeat violence, sexual violence, or dating violence, 115 including the specific acts underlying that history, are 116 admissible at trial to support the defendantâs claim of self 117 defense and the applicability of the rebuttable presumption. 118 Such evidence is admissible regardless of whether the defendant 119 knew of its existence at the precise moment force was used, to 120 establish the context of the relationship and reasonableness of 121 fear. 122 Section 3.âSection 943.1721, Florida Statutes, is created 123 to read: 124 943.1721âTrauma-informed training for legal personnel in 125 domestic violence cases.â 126 (1)âThe department, in consultation with the Office of the 127 State Courts Administrator and recognized experts in domestic 128 violence and dating violence trauma, shall develop, implement, 129 and mandate an evidence-based, trauma-informed training program. 130 This training must be required for: 131 (a)âLaw enforcement officers, including patrol officers, 132 detectives, and supervisors, involved in responding to or 133 investigating domestic or dating violence incidents. 134 (b)âState attorneys and assistant state attorneys 135 prosecuting criminal cases. 136 (c)âJudges presiding over criminal cases, including 137 pretrial hearings, trials, and sentencing, involving allegations 138 of domestic violence or dating violence or related self-defense 139 claims. 140 (2)âThe training program must provide practical instruction 141 on recognizing common trauma responses in survivors, including, 142 but not limited to, freezing, dissociation, memory 143 fragmentation, and fear-based compliance; understanding dynamics 144 of coercive control and entrapment; and applying trauma-informed 145 techniques or interviews and evidence collection and assessing 146 the context of self-defense claims to avoid misinterpreting 147 survival behaviors. 148 (3)âThe department shall adopt rules to establish a trauma 149 informed training program for the persons specified in 150 paragraphs (1)(a)-(c), which rules must include standards for 151 curriculum, frequency, and certification. The persons specified 152 in paragraphs (1)(a)-(c) must complete training according to 153 such rules. 154 (4)âThe department shall submit a report by December 1, 155 2027, and annually thereafter, to the Attorney General, the 156 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 157 Representatives regarding compliance and program effectiveness. 158 (5)âFederal and state grants may supplement any legislative 159 appropriation to ensure continued funding and operation of the 160 training program. 161 Section 4.âSection 947.271, Florida Statutes, is created to 162 read: 163 947.271âSurvivor Self-Defense Case Review Panel.â 164 (1)âESTABLISHMENT.âThe commission shall establish a 165 Survivor Self-Defense Case Review Panel to evaluate convictions 166 where evidence of domestic violence, dating violence, or 167 coercive control may have materially impacted the adjudication 168 of self-defense claims. 169 (2)âPANEL FUNCTIONS.âThe panel shall do all of the 170 following: 171 (a)âReview petitions from incarcerated individuals 172 convicted of offenses involving the use of force against an 173 intimate partner or family or household member as defined in s. 174 741.28 where: 175 1.âThe petitioner presents documented evidence of prior 176 abuse as a victim; and 177 2.âSelf-defense was asserted at trial or would be relevant 178 under s. 776.012. 179 (b)âRecommend appropriate remedies to the commission, 180 including sentence reduction, conditional release, or support 181 for postconviction relief motions. 182 (c)âFacilitate pro bono legal counsel for petitioners 183 through partnerships with nonprofit legal service providers. 184 (3)âIMPLEMENTATION.âThe commission shall adopt rules 185 governing all of the following: 186 (a)âApplication procedures and eligibility criteria. 187 (b)âPanel composition and operating standards. 188 (c)âPrioritization of cases based on length of 189 incarceration, age, health, or other humanitarian factors. 190 (d)âCoordination with state attorneys, victim advocates, 191 and the Justice Administrative Commission. 192 (4)âREPORTING.âThe commission shall submit a report by 193 December 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, to the Governor, the 194 Attorney General, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker 195 of the House of Representatives. The report must include all of 196 the following: 197 (a)âThe number of petitions received and reviewed; 198 (b)âAny recommended remedies; and 199 (c)âAny barriers to justice identified through panel work. 200 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.